Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1309.01
Temporary detour designated part of state highway system; Director-State Engineer; powers; duties.

The Director-State Engineer may waive the consideration of factors pursuant to section 39-1309 before a county road used as a temporary detour for the state highway system is designated as part of such state highway system. The director may designate a county road as part of the state highway system over which the department shall have responsibility, as soon as such road is deemed a temporary detour for the state highway system.

If such county road remains a detour road for the state highway system one year after it was initially designated a detour road, the Director-State Engineer shall consider the factors in section 39-1309 to determine whether such road shall continue as part of the state highway system. Upon a determination by the director that such road shall no longer be part of the state highway system, the director shall provide notice of such fact to the county board or the county's governing body having primary authority for such road.

Laws 1981, LB 285, § 4.